Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 2

Bridges

54-11-201. Bridges to be made by overseer — Securing materials.

Bridges shall be made by the overseer and the overseer's assistants, through swamps and over small runs and creeks, for which purpose, as well as for making causeways, the overseer may cut poles and other necessary timber, without incurring any penalty.

Code 1858, § 1211 (deriv. Acts 1804, ch. 1, §§ 14, 16); Shan., § 1707a1; Code 1932, § 3017; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1107.

Cross-References. Railroad drawbridges over navigable streams, § 69-1-114.

Collateral References. Bridges
1 et seq.

54-11-202. Bridges to be made by county — Tax levy.

Bridges that cannot be built by the overseer and the overseer's assistants shall be a county charge, and the county legislative body shall make a levy on the taxables to raise money for the purpose, and shall contract and agree for building, keeping, and repairing the bridges.

Code 1858, § 1212 (deriv. Acts 1804, ch. 1, § 5); Shan., § 1708; Code 1932, § 3018; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1108.

Cross-References. Levees or drains necessitating county to build, § 69-5-713.

Railroad drawbridges over navigable streams, § 69-1-114.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Bridges, § 5.

54-11-203. Bridges to be made by two counties — Apportionment of cost.

When a bridge is necessary over any creek or river that divides one county from another, the legislative body of each county shall join in an agreement for building, keeping, and repairing it, and the charge shall be defrayed by both counties in proportion to the number of taxable polls in each county.

Code 1858, § 1213 (deriv. Acts 1804, ch. 1, § 5); Shan., § 1709; Code 1932, § 3019; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1109.

Cross-References. Joint ferries over streams separating counties, § 54-11-303.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Bridges, § 5.

54-11-204. Contract, agreement and order binding.

Every contract, agreement, and order for bridges shall bind the county that makes or enters into it.

Code 1858, § 1214 (deriv. Acts 1804, ch. 1, § 6); Shan., § 1710; Code 1932, § 3020; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1110.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Bridges, § 5.

54-11-205. Bridge railings — Height.

It is the duty of the county legislative bodies, in letting out all contracts for the erection of bridges, to require that they be made secure, with good and substantial railing of the height of three feet (3').

Acts 1870-1871, ch. 119, § 1; Shan., § 1747; Code 1932, § 3073; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1111.

54-11-206. [Repealed.]

Code 1858, § 1215 (deriv. Acts 1804, ch. 1, § 7); Shan., § 1711; Code 1932, § 3021; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1112; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 10, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 54-11-206 concerned maintenance and repair of toll bridges and causeways.

54-11-207. Power of county legislative body to build bridges.

In addition to the powers vested in and exercised by county legislative bodies over public roads and bridges, the county legislative bodies respectively are empowered, the same being a county purpose, to build a bridge or bridges over and across any stream or river running through the county, which bridge shall be located on or near and convenient to a public highway, due regard being had both to advantages of location and convenience of the citizens of the county having to pass over the bridge, and may be located wholly or partly within the limits of any municipal corporation.

Acts 1885, ch. 149, § 1; Shan., § 1712; Code 1932, § 3022; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1113.

Cross-References. Eminent domain for bridges, title 29, ch. 17, part 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Bridges, §§ 4, 6.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of imposing different property tax rates within a county, OAG 92-29 (4/7/92).

54-11-208. Bridge tax — Special levy.

The bridge or bridges shall be paid for by special tax, not to exceed, in any year, twenty cents (20¢) on the one hundred dollars' ($100) worth of property, to be levied by the county legislative body annually on all taxable property of the county, until the bridge or bridges are paid for, or until the interest-bearing warrants or bonds provided for in this part are redeemed.

Nothing in this part shall prevent the county legislative body from paying for the bridge or bridges or redeeming any or all of the warrants or bonds, out of any moneys or funds in the county treasury not otherwise appropriated.

Acts 1885, ch. 149, § 2; Shan., § 1713; Code 1932, § 3023; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1114.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Bridges, § 5.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of imposing different property tax rates within a county, OAG 92-29 (4/7/92).

54-11-209. Excess cost in constructing bridges.

Should it, in the opinion of the county legislative body, appear that the cost of the bridge or bridges will exceed the amounts raised by taxation the county legislative body sees as proper to levy during the time the bridge or bridges are being constructed, the excess may be provided for from the proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to title 9, chapter 21.

Acts 1885, ch. 149, § 3; Shan., § 1714; Code 1932, § 3024; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1115; Acts 1980, ch. 601, § 17; 1988, ch. 750, § 58.

Cross-References. Maximum effective rates of interest, § 47-14-103.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Bridges, § 5.

54-11-210, 54-11-211. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 54-11-210 and 54-11-211 (Acts 1885, ch. 149, § 4; 1903, ch. 586, § 1; Code 1932, §§ 3025, 3026; Shan., §§ 1714a1, 1715; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 54-1116, 54-1117), concerning amount of warrants or bonds limited unless voted by the people and bond record, were repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 60.

54-11-212. Voting for a bridge — Procedure.

Whenever, in the opinion of the county legislative body, it will be best so to do, it may submit to a vote of the people of the county the question of whether any bridge shall be built or not.

The county legislative body shall direct the county election commission to hold an election on the question.

If a majority of the votes cast are for a bridge, the county legislative body, at its next regular session, shall order the bridge built; if against it, no bridge shall be ordered built by the county legislative body within two (2) years after the election in subsection (b) was ordered, unless the question is again submitted to the people and voted on favorably.

Acts 1885, ch. 149, § 5; Shan., § 1716; Code 1932, § 3027; modified; Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1118.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Bridges, § 4.

54-11-213. Proceeding by petition for building bridge or causeway — Appointment of commissioner.

If a petition filed under § 54-13-103 is for building a bridge or causeway at the expense of the county, the county legislative body shall, at the same session when it is presented, appoint three (3) commissioners to receive proposals for the work, which proposals shall clearly specify the extent, character, and description of the bridge or causeway.

The commissioners shall report their proceedings to the session designated by the county legislative body.

Code 1858, § 1266 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 29, § 3); Shan., § 1730; Code 1932, § 3056; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1119.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Bridges, §§ 4, 6.

54-11-214. Acceptance of proposal.

Of the proposals reported, the county legislative body may receive and accept that which seems to it best; and shall then direct the work to progress under regulations and securities it deems proper.

Code 1858, § 1267 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 29, § 3); Shan., § 1731; Code 1932, § 3057; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1120.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Bridges, § 6.

54-11-215. Examination of work upon completion by commissioners appointed by county legislative body — Payment.

Upon being notified that the work is completed, the county legislative body shall appoint three (3) commissioners, unconnected either by affinity or consanguinity with the contractor, to examine and report upon the work.

The county legislative body, if satisfied that the work is done conformably to the contract, shall receive it, and make an order on the county trustee as the contract may require.

Code 1858, § 1268 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 29, § 3); Shan., § 1732; Code 1932, § 3058; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1121.

54-11-216. Vacancy in board of commissioners — Bond and oath.

The county legislative body shall fill all vacancies on any board of town, or bridge commissioners, and any person appointed to fill a vacancy shall execute the same bond, if a bond is required, take the same oath, and have the same powers and emoluments, as the predecessor.

Code 1858, § 1269 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 29, § 12); Shan., § 1733; mod. Code 1932, § 3059; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1122.

54-11-217. Tax for payment of bridge or causeway.

Public bridges and causeways on public roads, erected by order of the county legislative body, shall be paid for by a tax on polls and other taxables, to be set by the county legislative body, and not to exceed, in any year, the amount of the state tax.

Code 1858, § 1270 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 29, § 2); Shan., § 1734; Code 1932, § 3060; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1123.

54-11-218. Taxes to be collected by trustee.

The moneys shall be collected by the county trustee and be kept by the county trustee subject to the order of the county legislative body, which order, together with the receipt of the person in whose favor it is made, shall be a sufficient voucher for the county trustee in settlement with the county mayor.

Code 1858, § 1271 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 29, § 2); Shan., § 1735; mod. Code 1932, § 3061; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1124; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

54-11-219. Bridges over rivers through county seat towns.

A county legislative body is empowered, the same being a county purpose, to build, or assist in building, or in obtaining within the corporate limits of a municipal corporation that is the county seat of the county, a toll-free bridge across any river running through and dividing the municipality and county.

Acts 1881, ch. 95, § 1; Shan., §§ 1635, 6049; Code 1932, §§ 2762, 10254; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1125.

Cross-References. Railroad drawbridges over navigable streams, § 69-1-114.

54-11-220. Location of bridges in county seat towns — Toll-free — Maintenance.

The bridge shall be located upon or near and convenient to a public highway traversing the county, due regard being had both to the advantages of location and convenience of the citizens of the county having to pass over the bridge.

The bridge shall be forever free to all persons, vehicles, and stock that may pass over the bridge, and shall be kept up and maintained by the municipality within which it is located.

Acts 1881, ch. 95, § 1; Shan., §§ 1636, 6049; Code 1932, §§ 2763, 10254; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1126.

54-11-221. Special tax for bridge in county seat towns — Payment from proceeds of stock or bond sales.

The bridge shall be paid for by a special tax, not to exceed, in any year, the amount of the state tax, to be levied by the county legislative body, annually, on all the taxables of the county.

Nothing in this section shall prevent the county legislative body from paying for the bridge out of any moneys or funds in the county treasury not otherwise appropriated, or by a sale or sales of any stocks or bonds held and owned by the county, and that may be sold or negotiated for the purpose of the payment.

Acts 1881, ch. 95, § 2; Shan., §§ 1637, 6050; Code 1932, §§ 2764, 10255; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1127.

Cross-References. County legislative body, power to build bridges and turnpikes, and to work convicts, §§ 54-10-102, 54-11-201 — 54-11-209, § 54-11-212, 54-11-222 — 54-11-224.

Cited: Southern R. Co. v. Hamblen County, 115 Tenn. 526, 92 S.W. 238, 1905 Tenn. LEXIS 85 (1906).

54-11-222. Joint county and city bridges authorized — Terms — Toll or free.

The county, acting through the county legislative body, has the power to unite with any municipal corporation in the erection and regulation of bridges for public travel and traffic, over any stream, running by or through the municipality, upon terms agreed upon by the county and municipality erecting the bridges.

The bridges may be toll or free, and may be changed from toll to free, or from free to toll bridges, from time to time, by the joint action of the county and municipality interested.

Acts 1901, ch. 99, § 1; Shan., § 1716a1; Code 1932, § 3028; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1128.

Cross-References. Bridges over rivers through county seat towns, §§ 54-11-219 — 54-11-227.

Law Reviews.

Consolidation of County and City Functions and Other Devices for Simplifying Tennessee Local Government (Wallace Mendelson), 8 Vand. L. Rev. 878.

54-11-223. Power to issue bonds.

For the purpose of providing funds to erect bridges, the county and municipality have the power to issue bonds pursuant to title 9, chapter 21.

Acts 1901, ch. 99, § 2; Shan., § 1716a2; mod. Code 1932, § 3029; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1129; Acts 1980, ch. 601, § 18; 1988, ch. 750, § 59.

Cross-References. Maximum effective rates of interest, § 47-14-103.

Collateral References.

Sale of municipal or other public bonds at less than par or face value. 91 A.L.R. 7, 162 A.L.R. 396.

54-11-224. Tolls — Rules for management.

The county and municipal corporation erecting a bridge as provided in §§ 54-11-222 and 54-11-223 have the power to fix the tolls to be charged and collected and provide for the collection of the tolls, and make all necessary rules and regulations for the keeping up and management of the bridge when erected.

Acts 1901, ch. 99, § 3; Shan., § 1716a3; Code 1932, § 3030; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1130.

54-11-225. Repairs of bridges by county legislative bodies — Commissioners to make contracts.

The county legislative body has full power, at any session of the county legislative body, when, in its opinion, the public good demands it, to appoint commissioners, who shall have power to contract for, and have completed, any repairs of bridges, levees or causeways, upon any public road in the county that, in the opinion of the county legislative body, the public good requires.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 90, § 1; Shan., § 1738; mod. Code 1932, § 3064; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1131.

Cross-References. County legislative body empowered to build bridges, § 54-10-102.

54-11-226. Report of commissioners as to repairs.

It is the duty of the commissioners under § 54-11-225 to report to the first session of the county legislative body after the completion of any work that they may have had under contract, which report shall set forth the kind of repairs that have been made, by whom made, and for what amount.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 90, § 2; Shan., § 1739; Code 1932, § 3065; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1132.

54-11-227. Payment of reported repairs.

Upon the filing of the report of the commissioners, it shall be the duty of the county legislative body to order the repairs to be paid as other claims against the county.

Acts 1859-1860, ch. 90, § 3; Shan., § 1740; Code 1932, § 3066; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-1133.